Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4115
Act; how construed.

Except as provided in section 29-4105, the DNA Identification Information Act shall not limit or abrogate any existing authority of peace officers to collect, maintain, store, and utilize DNA samples for law enforcement purposes.

Laws 1997, LB 278, § 15;

Laws 2001, LB 432, § 8;

Laws 2006, LB 385, § 14.